Illinois, session 104th, SB2007.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 514A-38 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/14A-38 new)7    Sec. 14A-38. Advance academic studies ambassadors program.8    (a) As used in this Section, "advance academic studies 9ambassadors program" means a program established by a school 10or school district that maintains any of grades 9 through 12 11that recruits currently enrolled students who have 12successfully passed an advanced academic programs, as defined 13under Section 14A-17, to assist school staff with recruitment 14of other current students into advance academic programs and 15the promotion of advanced academic programs to students 16enrolled in the school and their families.17    (b) Any school or school district that maintains any of 18grades 9 through 12 may implement an advance academic studies 19ambassadors program as defined by this Section. The program's 20goals may include:21        (1) to improve the enrollment of students in advanced 22    academic programs within the school or district;23        (2) to improve the retention and academic success of   SB2007- 2 -LRB104 10197 LNS 20269 b1    students enrolled in advanced academic programs within the 2    school or district;3        (3) to provide students information, leadership 4    opportunities, and foster a sense of community among the 5    student body; and6        (4) to promote the importance and awareness of 7    advanced academic programs offered at the school or school 8    district to enrolled students and their families.9    (c) Subject to appropriation, the State Board of Education 10shall award competitive grants on an annual basis to schools 11and school districts that submit a grant application to the 12State Board of Education requesting funds to implement an 13advance academic studies ambassadors program under this 14Section who meet the following criteria:15        (1) the school or school district maintains any of the 16    grades 9 through 12; and17        (2) the school or school district's overall 18    performance in the previous academic year in the 5% of 19    Title I-eligible schools statewide under Part A (Title I) 20    of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act, as amended 21    by the Every Student Succeeds Act, or in the previous 22    academic year had a graduation rate of 67% or below.23    (d) The State Board of Education shall annually 24disseminate a request for applications for grants under this 25Section to schools and school districts that maintain any of 26grades 9 through 12. Grant applications shall be accepted on   SB2007- 3 -LRB104 10197 LNS 20269 b1an annual basis. The State Board of Education shall establish 2procedures for submitting requests for grants and issuing 3funds to approved applicants. The State Board of Education 4shall endeavor to prioritize grant awards to schools and 5school districts with discrepancies in participation and pass 6rates of advanced academic programs and accelerated placement 7among different student demographic groups.8    (e) The application for grants under this Section must 9include the following information:10        (1) the grades that the school or school district 11    serves;12        (2) the summative designation off the school or school 13    district;14        (3) the number and percentage of students, 15    disaggregated by demographic group, that participate in 16    and successfully pass advanced academic programs and 17    accelerated programs in the most recent academic year this 18    data is available;19        (4) the amount of funds the school or school district 20    is requiting to implement and administer the advance 21    academic studies ambassadors program; and22        (5) a spending plan detailing how the school or school 23    district will use the grant funds.24    (f) The State Board of Education may adopt any rules 25necessary for the implementation of this Section.